Washington statutes.
RCW 39.26.260

Preferences—In-state procurement.

The legislature finds that in-state preference clauses used by other states in procuring goods and services have a discriminatory effect against Washington vendors with resulting harm to this state's revenues and the welfare of this state's citizens. Chapter 183, Laws of 1983 is intended to promote fairness in state government procurement by requiring that, when appropriate, Washington exercise reciprocity with those states having in-state preferences, and it shall be liberally construed to that effect.

[ 1983 c 183 s 1. Formerly RCW 43.19.700.]